Missouri, session 2026, HB18.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein for the item or items
stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated for the period
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, as follows:
Section 18.005. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
For maintenance, repairs, replacements, unprogrammed requirements,
emergency requirements, operational maintenance and repair,
and improvements at facilities statewide
From Facilities Maintenance Reserve Fund (1124) .................................................$11,765,877
For maintenance, repairs, replacements, unprogrammed requirements,
emergency requirements, operational maintenance and repair,

SCS HCS HB 18 2
and improvements at various State Board of Education operated
school programs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,129,333
For maintenance, repairs, replacements, unprogrammed requirements,
emergency requirements, operational maintenance and repair,
and improvements at the Missouri School for the Blind
From School for the Blind Trust Fund (1920) ..................................................... 4,834,010
Total .........................................................................................................................$18,729,220
Section 18.010. To the Office of Administration
For the State Lottery Commission
For repairs, replacements, and improvements at the Missouri Lottery
Commission Headquarters
From Lottery Enterprise Fund (1657) ...........................................................................$615,165
Section 18.015. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Facilities Maintenance Reserve Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$122,086,968
Section 18.020. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
For emergency requirements, unprogrammed requirements, appraisals
and surveys, assessment, abatement, removal remediation, and
management of hazardous materials and pollutants, energy
conservation, building utilization, and project administration
requirements for facilities statewide
From Facilities Maintenance Reserve Fund (1124) ...............................................$110,725,129
Section 18.025. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
For maintenance, repairs, replacements, unprogrammed requirements,
emergency requirements, operational maintenance and repair,
and improvements at facilities statewide
From Department of Economic Development Federal Fund (1129) ............................$398,910
From Facilities Maintenance Reserve Fund (1124) .................................................147,498,028
From Board of Public Buildings Series A 2018 Capitol Bond Proceeds
Fund (1308) ......................................................................................................2,988,547

SCS HCS HB 18 3
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ........................................................... 648,000
Total .......................................................................................................................$151,533,485
Section 18.030. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
For receipt and expenditure of insurance or other reimbursements for
damage from natural or man-made events
From Facilities Maintenance Reserve Fund (1124) .................................................$25,000,000
Section 18.035. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Agriculture
For maintenance, repairs, replacements, unprogrammed requirements,
emergency requirements, operational maintenance and repair,
and improvements at facilities statewide
From Facilities Maintenance Reserve Fund (1124) .................................................$18,097,465
Section 18.040. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Natural Resources
For maintenance, repairs, replacements, unprogrammed requirements,
emergency requirements, operational maintenance and repair,
and improvements at facilities statewide
From Facilities Maintenance Reserve Fund (1124) ...................................................$3,516,312
Section 18.045. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For state park and historic site capital improvement expenditures,
including design, construction, renovation, maintenance, repairs,
replacements, improvements, installation and replacement of
interpretive exhibits, water and wastewater improvements,
maintenance and repair to existing roadways, parking areas, and
trails, acquisition, restoration, and marketing of endangered
historic properties, and expenditure of recoupments, donations,
and grants
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ................................$15,715,628
From Facilities Maintenance Reserve Fund (1124) ...................................................10,000,000
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) .....................................................................23,294,702
From Historic Preservation Revolving Fund (1430) ...................................................1,000,000
From State Park Sales Tax Fund (1613) .............................................................. 46,134,001
Total .........................................................................................................................$96,144,331

SCS HCS HB 18 4
Section 18.050. To the Department of Conservation
For stream access development; lake site development; financial
assistance to other public agencies or in partnership with other
public agencies; major improvements and repairs (including
materials, supplies, and labor) to buildings, roads, hatcheries, and
other departmental structures; and for soil conservation activities,
erosion control, and land improvement on department land
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) ......................................................$161,050,000
Section 18.055. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
For repairs, replacements, and improvements at facilities statewide
From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652) .................................................................$400,000
From Special Employment Security Fund (1949) ............................................... 800,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,200,000
Section 18.060. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For repairs, replacements, and improvements at Missouri State Highway
Patrol facilities statewide
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) .......................$85,125,043
Section 18.065. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For repairs, replacements, and improvements at state veterans’ homes
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$15,387,158
From Facilities Maintenance Reserve Fund (1124) ...................................................18,780,822
From Veterans’ Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304) …………...41,689,133
From Missouri Veterans Homes Fund (1460) ..................................................... 6,930,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$82,787,113
Section 18.070. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For maintenance and repair at National Guard facilities statewide
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190) ..........................................................$98,558,900
From Facilities Maintenance Reserve Fund (1124) ............................................. 37,532,736
Total .......................................................................................................................$136,091,636
Section 18.075. To the Office of Administration

SCS HCS HB 18 5
For the Department of Corrections
For maintenance, repairs, replacements, unprogrammed requirements,
emergency requirements, operational maintenance and repair,
and improvements at facilities statewide
From Facilities Maintenance Reserve Fund (1124) ...............................................$104,082,791
Section 18.080. To the Department of Corrections
For maintenance, repairs, replacements, unprogrammed requirements,
emergency requirements, operational maintenance and repair,
and improvements at facilities statewide
From Facilities Maintenance Reserve Fund (1124) .................................................$10,751,332
Section 18.085. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Mental Health
For maintenance, repairs, replacements, unprogrammed requirements,
emergency requirements, operational maintenance and repair,
and improvements at facilities statewide
From Facilities Maintenance Reserve Fund (1124) .................................................$71,696,116
From Board of Public Buildings Series A 2018 State Facilities Bond
Proceeds Fund (1307) ..........................................................................................150,000
From Fulton State Hospital Series 2016 Bond Proceeds Fund (1393) ................ 2,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$73,846,116
Section 18.090. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Social Services
For maintenance, repairs, replacements, unprogrammed requirements,
emergency requirements, operational maintenance and repair,
and improvements at facilities statewide
From Facilities Maintenance Reserve Fund (1124) ................................................$10,432,787
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 752,576
Total ........................................................................................................................$11,185,363
Bill Totals
General Revenue ....................................................................................................$139,603,459
Federal Funds ...........................................................................................................115,426,014
Other Funds .......................................................................................................... 377,658,601
Total ......................................................................................................................$632,688,074
